New Mexico, session 2026, HB112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. [NEW MATERIAL] EXEMPTION FROM ANNUAL CHANGE OF TIME.-- A. New Mexico is exempt from the advancement of time or changeover dates pursuant to Section 260a of the federal Uniform Time Act of 1966, as that section may be amended or renumbered, and adopts daylight saving time as the year-round standard of time for the entire state and all its political subdivisions. B. This section shall not be construed to affect the standard time established by federal law governing the movement of common carriers engaged in interstate commerce or the time for performance of an act by an officer or a department of the United States, as established by a statute, lawful order, rule or regulation of the United States or an agency thereof. C. As used in this section, "daylight saving time" means the federal standard time established pursuant to Section 260a of the federal Uniform Time Act of 1966, as that section may be amended or renumbered, during the period commencing at 2 o'clock antemeridian on the second Sunday of March of each year and ending at 2 o'clock antemeridian on the first Sunday of November of each year. SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the department of information technology for expenditure in fiscal years 2027 and 2028 for conversion of state information technology systems to permanent daylight saving time. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2028 shall revert to the general fund. SECTION 3. CONTINGENT EFFECTIVE DATE.--The effective date of the provisions of this act is the second Sunday of March or the first Sunday of November of a year, whichever occurs first, following the effective date of a federal law authorizing a state to exempt itself or a part of itself from Section 260a of the federal Uniform Time Act of 1966, as certified by the secretary of transportation to the New Mexico compilation commission and the director of the legislative council service; provided that: A. the state of Texas has enacted a law exempting Texas or a part of Texas that includes the county of El Paso, Texas, from Section 260a of the federal Uniform Time Act of 1966 and has adopted daylight saving time for the state of Texas or a part of the state of Texas that includes El Paso, Texas; or B. the county commission of El Paso county, Texas, has enacted an ordinance exempting El Paso county from Section 260a of the federal Uniform Time Act of 1966 and has adopted daylight saving time. - 3 -